Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.316, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. For the purpose of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meaning given them. (a) Commissioner. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of management and budget. (b) Employee. "Employee" means: (1) a person who is a public employee within the definition of section 179A.03, subdivision 14, who is insurance eligible and is employed by an eligible employer; (2) an elected public official of an eligible employer who is insurance eligible; (3) a person employed by a labor organization or employee association certified as an exclusive representative of employees of an eligible employer or by another public employer approved by the commissioner, so long as the plan meets the requirements of a governmental plan under United States Code, title 29, section 1002(32); or (4) a person employed by a county or municipal hospital. (c) Eligible employer. "Eligible employer" means: (1) a public employer within the definition of section 179A.03, subdivision 15, that is a town, county, city, school district as defined in section 120A.05, service cooperative as defined in section 123A.21, intermediate district as defined in section 136D.01, Cooperative Center for Vocational Education as defined in section 123A.22, regional management information center as defined in section 123A.23, or an education unit organized under the joint powers action, section 471.59; or (2) an exclusive representative of employees, as defined in paragraph (b); (3) a county or municipal hospital; or (4) another public employer approved by the commissioner. (d) Exclusive representative. "Exclusive representative" means an exclusive representative as defined in section 179A.03, subdivision 8. (e) Program. "Program" means the statewide public employees insurance program created by subdivision 3. new text begin (f) Retired firefighter. "Retired firefighter" means a former full-time firefighter, as defined in section 299N.03, subdivision 5, whose total age and years of qualifying service as a full-time firefighter for state and local agencies is at least 85. new text end new text begin (g) Retired peace officer. "Retired peace officer" means a former peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), whose total age and years of qualifying service as a peace officer for state and local law enforcement agencies is at least 85. new text end new text begin (h) Retired teacher. "Retired teacher" means a former teacher, as defined in section 179A.03, subdivision 18, whose total age and years of qualifying service as a teacher at public schools is at least 85. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.316, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Public employee participation. (a) Participation in the program is subject to the conditions in this subdivision. (b) Each exclusive representative for an eligible employer determines whether the employees it represents will participate in the program. The exclusive representative shall give the employer notice of intent to participate at least 30 days before the expiration date of the collective bargaining agreement preceding the collective bargaining agreement that covers the date of entry into the program. The exclusive representative and the eligible employer shall give notice to the commissioner of the determination to participate in the program at least 30 days before entry into the program. Entry into the program is governed by a schedule established by the commissioner. (c) Employees not represented by exclusive representatives may become members of the program upon a determination of an eligible employer to include these employees in the program. Either all or none of the employer's unrepresented employees must participate. The eligible employer shall give at least 30 days' notice to the commissioner before entering the program. Entry into the program is governed by a schedule established by the commissioner. (d) Participation in the program is for a four-year term. Participation is automatically renewed for an additional four-year term unless the exclusive representative, or the employer for unrepresented employees, gives the commissioner notice of withdrawal at least 30 days before expiration of the participation period. A group that withdraws must wait two years before rejoining. An exclusive representative, or employer for unrepresented employees, may also withdraw if premiums increase 20 percent or more from one insurance year to the next. (e) The exclusive representative shall give the employer notice of intent to withdraw to the commissioner at least 30 days before the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement that includes the date on which the term of participation expires. (f) Each participating eligible employer shall notify the commissioner of names of individuals who will be participating within two weeks of the commissioner receiving notice of the parties' intent to participate. The employer shall also submit other information as required by the commissioner for administration of the program. new text begin (g) This section does not apply to retired peace officers, retired firefighters, or retired teachers. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.316, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8a. new text end new text begin Retired peace officers. new text end new text begin (a) A retired peace officer and the retired peace officer's dependents are eligible to participate in the program until the retired peace officer reaches the age of 65. This participation is at the person's expense. Premiums for these participants must be established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may not provide policy exclusions for preexisting conditions. new text end new text begin (c) Chief law enforcement officers shall notify potentially qualified peace officers of the option to participate under this paragraph no later than the effective date of the peace officer's retirement. The retired peace officer must notify the commissioner within 30 days of the effective date of retirement of intent to participate in the program according to the rules established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) A participant who discontinues coverage may not reenroll. new text end new text begin (e) Persons participating under paragraphs (a) to (d) shall make appropriate premium payments in the time and manner established by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.316, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8b. new text end new text begin Retired firefighters. new text end new text begin (a) A retired firefighter and the retired firefighter's dependents are eligible to participate in the program until the retired firefighter reaches the age of 65. This participation is at the person's expense. Premiums for these participants must be established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may not provide policy exclusions for preexisting conditions. new text end new text begin (c) Fire chiefs shall notify potentially qualified firefighters of the option to participate under this paragraph no later than the effective date of the firefighter's retirement. The retired firefighter must notify the commissioner within 30 days of the effective date of retirement of intent to participate in the program according to the rules established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) A participant who discontinues coverage may not reenroll. new text end new text begin (e) Persons participating under paragraphs (a) to (d) shall make appropriate premium payments in the time and manner established by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.316, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8c. new text end new text begin Retired teachers. new text end new text begin (a) A retired teacher and the retired teacher's dependents are eligible to participate in the program until the retired teacher reaches the age of 65. This participation is at the person's expense. Premiums for these participants must be established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may not provide policy exclusions for preexisting conditions. new text end new text begin (c) Superintendents shall notify potentially qualified teachers of the option to participate under this paragraph no later than the effective date of the teacher's retirement. The retired teacher must notify the commissioner within 30 days of the effective date of retirement of intent to participate in the program according to the rules established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) A participant who discontinues coverage may not reenroll. new text end new text begin (e) Persons participating under paragraphs (a) to (d) shall make appropriate premium payments in the time and manner established by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [626.8518] INTENSIVE COMPREHENSIVE PEACE OFFICER EDUCATION AND TRAINING PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; title. new text end new text begin A program is established within the Department of Public Safety to fund the intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and training of college degree holders. The program shall be known as the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The program is intended to address the critical shortage of peace officers in the state. The program shall reimburse law enforcement agencies that recruit, educate, and train highly qualified college graduates to become licensed peace officers in the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility for reimbursement grant; grant cap. new text end new text begin (a) The chief law enforcement officer of a law enforcement agency may apply to the commissioner for reimbursement of the cost of educating, training, paying, and insuring an eligible peace officer candidate until the candidate is licensed by the board as a peace officer. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must reimburse an agency for the actual cost of educating, training, paying, and insuring an eligible peace officer candidate up to $50,000. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall not award a grant under this section until the candidate has been licensed by the board. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility for retention bonus reimbursement grant. new text end new text begin (a) The chief law enforcement officer of a law enforcement agency may apply to the commissioner for a onetime reimbursement grant for a retention bonus awarded to an eligible peace officer candidate after the candidate has worked for a minimum of two years as a licensed peace officer for the applicant's agency. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must reimburse an agency for the actual cost of an eligible retention bonus up to $10,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Eligibility for student loan reimbursement grant. new text end new text begin (a) An eligible peace officer candidate, after serving for ....... consecutive years as a licensed peace officer in good standing for a law enforcement agency, may apply to the commissioner for a grant to cover student loan debt incurred by the applicant in earning the applicant's four-year degree. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall reimburse the applicant for the amount of the applicant's student loan debt up to $20,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Forms. new text end new text begin The commissioner must prepare the necessary grant application forms and make them available on the agency's public website. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Intensive education and skills training program. new text end new text begin No later than February 1, 2024, the commissioner, in consultation with the executive director of the board and the institutions designated as education providers under subdivision 8, shall develop an intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training curriculum that will provide eligible peace officer candidates with the law enforcement education and skills training needed to be licensed as a peace officer. The curriculum must be designed to be completed in eight months or less and shall be offered at the institutions designated under subdivision 8. The curriculum may overlap, coincide with, or draw upon existing law enforcement education and training programs at institutions designated as education providers under subdivision 8. The commissioner may designate existing law enforcement education and training programs that are designed to be completed in eight months or less as intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training programs for purposes of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Education providers; sites. new text end new text begin (a) No later than September 1, 2023, the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities shall designate at least two regionally diverse system campuses to provide the required intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training to eligible peace officer candidates. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the campuses designated under paragraph (a), the commissioner may designate private, nonprofit postsecondary institutions to provide the required intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training to eligible peace officer candidates. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin An intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program account is created in the special revenue fund for depositing money appropriated to or received by the department for this program. Money deposited in the account is appropriated to the commissioner, does not cancel, and is continuously available to fund the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible peace officer candidate" means a person who: new text end new text begin (1) holds a four-year degree from an accredited college or university; new text end new text begin (2) is a citizen of the United States; new text end new text begin (3) passed a thorough background check, including searches by local, state, and federal agencies, to disclose the existence of any criminal record or conduct which would adversely affect the candidate's performance of peace officer duties; new text end new text begin (4) possesses a valid Minnesota driver's license or, in case of residency therein, a valid driver's license from another state, or eligibility to obtain either license; and new text end new text begin (5) is sponsored by a state or local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (d) "Law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), clause (1). new text end new text begin (e) "Program" means the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; INTENSIVE COMPREHENSIVE PEACE OFFICER EDUCATION AND TRAINING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Commissioner of public safety; program creation and administration. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund for transfer to the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program account in the special revenue fund to establish and administer the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public safety; outreach. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund for transfer to the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program account in the special revenue fund to conduct outreach to qualified candidates for the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program. The commissioner shall use the funds to target and recruit candidates or groups of candidates who meet the program's eligibility requirements with an emphasis placed on reaching candidates from groups that are currently underrepresented in law enforcement and who represent the state's increasingly diverse population. The commissioner shall conduct outreach directly to statewide and national peace officer affinity groups that represent groups that are currently underrepresented in law enforcement. The commissioner shall contract with an agency with proven experience and success in targeting and recruiting candidates for specific professions. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end